Utah statutes.
17B-1-501.   Definition.

As used in this part, "receiving entity" means the entity that will, after the withdrawal of an area from a local district, provide to the withdrawn area the service that the local district previously provided to the area.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

